Maryland, session 2026, SB0289.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
5–223.
(b) (1) There is a Concentration of Poverty School Grant Program in the State.
(2) The purpose of the Program is to provide grants to eligible schools with
a high concentration of eligible students.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0289*

SENATE BILL 289
(3) The Program consists of the:
(i) Personnel grant; and
(ii) Per pupil grant.
(c) (9) The personnel and per pupil grant may be used [through fiscal year
2027] to provide the programs required under COMAR Title 13A, Subtitle 04, including
13A.04.16.01.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.